California, session 20252026, AB475.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2700 of the Penal Code is amended to read:2700. (a) (1) The Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation shall develop a voluntary work program and prescribe the rules and regulations regarding voluntary work assignments for individuals incarcerated in facilities operated by the department.(2) Except as otherwise provided in Section 2700.1, the department, on and after January 1, 2027, shall not require incarcerated persons to work.(3) Any work performed by an incarcerated person after January 1, 2027, except those persons described in Section 2700.1, shall be through a voluntary work program.(b) (1) Notwithstanding any state law or local ordinance governing minimum wages, compensation for any work assignment in state prison shall be set by regulations promulgated by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation.(2) Notwithstanding any state law or local ordinance governing minimum wages, compensation for any work assignment in county and city jail programs shall be set by local ordinance.(c) Whenever by any statute a price is required to be fixed for any services to be performed in connection with the work program of the department, the compensation paid to incarcerated persons shall be included as an item of cost in fixing the final statutory price.(d) Incarcerated persons not engaged on work programs under the jurisdiction of the Prison Industry Authority, but who are engaged in productive labor outside of such programs may be compensated in like manner. The compensation of those persons shall be paid either out of funds appropriated by the Legislature for that purpose or out of such other funds available to the department for expenditure, as the Director of Finance may direct.(e) When an incarcerated person escapes, the secretary shall determine what portion of that person’s earnings shall be forfeited and the forfeiture shall be deposited in the State Treasury in a fund known as the Inmate Welfare Fund.SEC. 2. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.